Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.19
Manufacture, defined.

Manufacture means to distill,
rectify, ferment, brew, make, mix, concoct, process, blend, bottle, or fill
an original package with any alcoholic liquor and includes blending but does
not include the mixing or other preparation of drinks for serving by those
persons authorized and permitted in the Nebraska Liquor Control Act to serve
drinks for consumption on the premises where sold.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 27.